Massachusetts, session 194th, H2403.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 222. (a) There is hereby established within the executive office of health and
human services the human service transportation (HST) consumer advisory board, hereinafter
referred to as the board, to advance the quality of nonemergency transportation to medical,
community and other health and human services for persons with disabilities across the
commonwealth and to identify challenges and solutions to address the experience and concerns
of consumers using this service in order to ensure that HST is safe and reliable for all consumers.
(b) The board shall engage in activities that support its goals to identify challenges and
solutions, make recommendations for improvements and propose guidelines on non-emergency
of 4

human services transportation in order to provide the highest quality of service for consumers in
the commonwealth, identify opportunities for improved service and productivity and provide a
strong safety net for vulnerable populations in rural and urban communities. These activities
shall include, but not be limited to:
(i) activities that elicit consumer experiences, feedback and insight into program
participation as well as the ability to invite representatives from vendors, providers and referral
sources in their attempt to capture information relevant to their purpose;
(ii) a minimum of six public meetings annually, as required by subsection (d);
(iii) consumer listening sessions pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (d);
(iv) an annual report, as required by subsection (d); and
(v) any other activity consistent with the purpose of the board.
(c) The board shall consist of 13 members who shall include; the secretary of health and
human services or their designee who shall be a non-voting member and shall serve as the
convenor of the board; the director of MassHealth or their designee who shall be a non-voting
member; and 11 voting members appointed by the governor: 1 of whom shall be appointed from
a list of 3 consumers recommended by the Massachusetts developmental disabilities council; 1 of
whom shall be appointed from a list of 3 consumers recommended by the Massachusetts Mental
Health Association; 1 of whom shall be appointed from a list of 3 consumers recommended by
the statewide independent living council; 1 of whom shall be appointed from a list of 3
consumers recommended by Stavros center for independent living; 1 of whom shall be appointed
from a list of 3 consumers recommended by Independence Associates center for independent
of 4

living; 1 of whom shall be appointed from a list of 3 consumers recommended by the Boston
Center for Independent Living, Inc.; 1 of whom shall be appointed from a list of 3 consumers
recommended by the Dignity Alliance; 1 of whom shall be appointed from a list of 3 consumers
recommended by Arc Massachusetts, Inc.; 1 of whom shall be appointed from a list of 3
consumers recommended by the Disability Law Center; 1 of whom shall be appointed from a list
of 3 consumers or consumer surrogates recommended by Mass Senior Care and the
Massachusetts Council on Aging; and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the governor at their
discretion.
(d)(1) The board shall meet a minimum of six times a year, all meetings of the board shall
be held remotely and open to the public. Notice of remote meetings shall be posted as soon as
reasonably possible prior to meeting. Notice shall be printed or posted in a legible, easily
understandable format and shall contain the date, time and instructions for remote access and
participation. The convenor of the meeting shall further include with the notice a listing of the
topics that the convenor reasonably anticipates will be discussed at the meeting.
(2) In order to engage in in activities that elicit consumer experiences, feedback and
insight into program participation as well as the ability to invite representatives from vendors,
providers and referral sources in their attempt to capture information relevant to their purpose,
the board shall host and report on two virtual consumer listening sessions annually, preceded by
targeted outreach to users of human services transportation services.
(3) The consumer advisory board shall file an annual report of its recommendations with
the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the house and senate committees on ways
and means, the joint committee on transportation, the joint committee on children, families and
of 4

persons with disabilities, the secretary of health and human services and the secretary of
transportation not later than December 1. The recommendations shall be used by the human
services transportation office to improve non-emergency human services transportation broker
services.
The human services transportation office will provide the Board with an update of its
actions with regard to the report’s recommendations.
(4) The human services transportation office shall staff the consumer advisory task force,
assist with facilitation for board outreach activities, and ensure its operation and scheduling.
of 4